Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-507
Process for selecting design-builder or progressive design-builder.

(1) The process for selecting a design-builder and entering into a design-build contract shall be in accordance with sections 61-508 to 61-511.

(2) Except as otherwise specifically provided in the Public Water and Natural Resources Project Contracting Act, the process for selecting a progressive design-builder and entering into a progressive design-build contract shall be in accordance with sections 61-508 to 61-511.

Laws 2023, LB565, § 7.